Maine, session 132, LD54.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 26 MRSA §622-A is enacted to read:
§622-A. Pay transparency
This section governs disclosure and record keeping by employers of employee pay
information.
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Posting" means a solicitation that is intended to recruit employment applicants for
a specific available position and that includes qualifications for desired applicants,
including recruitment done directly by an employer or indirectly through a 3rd party.
"Posting" includes postings made electronically or with a printed hard copy.
B. "Range of pay" means the range of pay that an employer anticipates relying on in
setting wages for a position, including, but not limited to, reference to:
(1) Any applicable pay scale;
(2) A previously determined range of wages for the position;
(3) The actual range of wages for those currently holding equivalent positions; or
(4) The budgeted amount for the position.
"Range of pay" does not include compensation that is based solely on commission.
2. Employer with 10 or more employees. An employer that has 10 or more
employees shall ensure that a posting includes a statement that lists the prospective range
of pay the employer will offer to a successful applicant unless the position that is the subject
of the posting is compensated solely on the basis of commission, in which case the required
posted statement must indicate that the compensation for the position is based solely on
commission.
Page 1 - 132LR0106(07)

3. Pay disclosure; records. Upon the request of an employee, an employer shall
disclose the range of pay the employer offers for the position the employee holds. An
employer shall maintain a record of each position held by an employee and the pay history
of the employee in each position for the duration of the employee's employment with the
employer and for 3 years after the termination of the employee's employment.
Sec. 2. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
LABOR, DEPARTMENT OF
Regulation and Enforcement 0159
Initiative: Provides ongoing funds for one Labor and Safety Inspector position and provides
funding for related All Other costs to enforce the requirement that employers disclose pay
ranges and maintain records of employees' pay histories.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
POSITIONS - LEGISLATIVE COUNT 0.000 1.000
Personal Services $0 $75,336
All Other $0 $6,065
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $81,401
Page 2 - 132LR0106(07)